Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 830.908 is amended to read:
830.908. As used in ORS 830.908 to 830.948:
(1) “Abandoned vessel” means a vessel that [ has been left without authorization on public or
private land, the waters of this  state, or any other water ] is on public or private land, the waters
of this state or any other water without authorization .
(2) “Authorized agency” means a law  enforcement agency, a federal agency, the State
Marine Board or any other public body, as defined in ORS 174.109.
[(2)] (3)  “Business day” means any day other than  a Saturday, a Sunday or a legal holiday as
described in ORS 187.010.
[(3)] (4) “Derelict vessel” means a vessel that is on the  waters of this state  or is in such close
proximity to the waters of this state that the vessel is likely to enter the water  and that is:
(a) Sunk or in imminent danger of sinking;
(b) Obstructing a waterway;
(c) Endangering life or property; [ or]
(d) In such dilapidated condition that it is in danger of becoming [ a significant] an environmental
hazard, which may be evidenced by instances  of leaking fuel, sewage or other pollutants  [ as
evidenced by repeated and documented instances of leaking fuel, sewage or other pollutants. ]; or
(e) Likely to meet one of the conditions listed in  this subsection if the vessel enters the
water.
[(4) “Enforcement agency” means  a law enforcement agency, a federal agency, the State Marine
Board or any other public body, as defined in ORS  174.109, that has responsibility for land or water
on which an abandoned vessel or a derelict vessel is located. ]
(5) “Marine debris” has the meaning given that term in ORS 274.376.
[(5)] (6) “Owner” means a person who [ has a property interest in a vessel ] is listed as the owner
of a vessel in the records of the State Marine Board or another state agency .
[(6)(a)] (7)(a)  “Vessel” means a boat, a boathouse as defined in ORS  830.700, a floating home as
defined in ORS  830.700, or any other floating structure that is normally secured to a pier or pilings.
(b) “Vessel” does not include :
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 1
(A) A dock as defined in ORS 307.120 ;
(B) A boat that is no longer capable of being  used as a means of transportation on the
water due its dilapidated condition; or
(C) Any structure or component of a structure that,  in its current state, does not meet
the definition of boathouse or floating home in ORS 830.700 .
SECTION 2.  ORS 274.376 is amended to read:
274.376. As used in ORS 274.376 to 274.388:
(1) “Abandoned structure” means a structure  that has been left without authorization on, under
or over state-owned submerged or submersible lands.
[(2) “Abandoned vessel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.908. ]
[(3)] (2) “Derelict structure” means a structure that is on, under or over state-owned submerged
or submersible lands and that is:
(a) Sunk or in imminent danger of sinking due to its dilapidated condition;
(b) Obstructing a waterway;
(c) Endangering life or property; or
(d) In dilapidated condition such that  it is in danger of becoming an environmental hazard [ as
evidenced by instances of leaking fuel, sewage or other pollutants ].
[(4) “Derelict vessel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.908. ]
[(5)] (3)  “Marine debris” means any manufactured or processed solid material , or a boat, as
defined in ORS 830.700, that is no longer capable of being used as a means of transportation
on the water due its dilapidated condition,  that:
(a) Persists in the marine environment; and
(b) Is disposed of or  abandoned, either with intention or unintentionally, in  or in close prox-
imity to  any waters of which the submersible or submerged lands belong to the State of Oregon.
[(6)] (4) “Owner” means a person who has a property interest in a structure [ or vessel ].
SECTION 3.
 ORS 830.911 is amended to read:
830.911. [(1) An enforcement agency may seize a vessel as an abandoned vessel if: ]
[(a) The enforcement agency has probable cause to believe the vessel is an abandoned vessel; and ]
[(b) An owner does not move the  vessel to a place where the vessel can be lawfully kept within the
time specified in the notice given  under ORS 830.918, or within such additional time as may be speci-
fied in an order issued under ORS 830.936 (6). ]
[(2) An enforcement agency may seize a vessel as a derelict vessel if: ]
[(a) The enforcement agency has probable cause to believe the vessel is a derelict vessel and the
enforcement agency documented the facts supporting that belief; and ]
[(b) The owner does not correct the problems identified  in the notice given under ORS 830.918
within the time specified in the notice, or within such additional time as  may be specified in an order
issued under ORS 830.936 (6). ]
[(3) A vessel may be seized as a derelict vessel by reason of an imminent danger of sinking only
if the enforcement agency has documented the facts supporting the belief that the  vessel is in imminent
danger of sinking. ]
[(4) If an enforcement agency has probable cause to believe a vessel is an  abandoned vessel or a
derelict vessel, the enforcement agency may: ]
[(a) Secure the vessel in such a manner as to prevent harm to  life or damage to property or to
prevent the vessel from becoming a hazard to navigation. ]
[(b) Take action to mitigate any imminent environmental threat the vessel poses. ]
[(c) Salvage, tow and store the vessel. ]
(1) If an authorized agency has probable cause to believe a vessel  is an abandoned vessel
or a derelict vessel, the enforcement agency may take any of the following actions:
(a) Initiate seizure of the vessel.
(b) Secure the vessel in such a manner as  to prevent harm to life or damage to property
or to prevent the vessel from becoming a hazard to navigation.
(c) Take action to mitigate any imminent environmental threat the vessel poses.
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 2
(d) Tow and store the vessel.
(2) When an authorized agency takes action as described in subsection (1)(b),  (c) or (d)
of this section, the agency shall make a good faith effort  to contact the owner of the vessel.
(3) An  authorized agency that seizes an abandoned vessel or derelict vessel shall give
notice before the vessel is seized as provided in ORS 830.918.
[(5)] (4)  If an [ enforcement] authorized  agency has  probable cause to believe a vessel is an
abandoned vessel, the [ enforcement] authorized agency may enter and inspect the interior of  the
vessel, and objects in plain view within the interior of  the vessel, only to the extent necessary to
identify the owners of the vessel.
[(6)] (5) If an [ enforcement] authorized agency has probable cause to believe a vessel is a  dere-
lict vessel by reason of endangering life  or property, or by reason of being in danger of becoming
an environmental hazard, the [ enforcement] authorized agency may enter and  inspect the interior
of the vessel, objects in plain view within the interior of the vessel,  and closed compartments within
the interior of the  vessel, only to the extent necessary to determine whether the vessel endangers
life or property, or is in danger of becoming an environmental hazard.
[(7)] (6) An Oregon State Police  officer, a sheriff, a deputy sheriff or a municipal police officer
may enter privately owned  land for the purpose of determining whether a vessel is abandoned only
with the consent of the landowner.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 830.918 is amended to read:
830.918. (1) [ Except as provided in ORS 830.923, ] At least 10 business days before seizing an
abandoned vessel or a derelict vessel an [ enforcement] authorized agency shall provide notice by:
(a) Attaching a notice to the vessel;  and
(b) If the vessel has or had a certificate under ORS  830.770 or 830.775 and the identifying
numbers on the  boat are clearly visible and legible as required under ORS 830.780, serve no-
tice by first class mail or, if requested by the recipient of the notice, by electronic mail, to
the owners.
[(b) If the vessel has or had a certificate under ORS 830.770 or 830.775,  mailing notice to the
persons last shown as owners of the vessel in the records of the State Marine Board; and ]
[(c) Mailing notice to any other person for  whom the enforcement agency has obtained a mailing
address and who the enforcement agency has reason to believe is an owner of the vessel. ]
(2) The notice required under this section must include:
(a) The name, mailing address and telephone number of the [ enforcement] authorized agency.
(b) A  statement indicating whether the [ enforcement] authorized agency proposes to seize the
vessel by reason of being an abandoned vessel, a derelict vessel, or both.
(c) The [ time] date  by which the owner must act to [ avoid having the vessel seized ] prevent
seizure of the vessel by the authorized agency .
[(d) A statement indicating that if the vessel is seized, the owner will be liable for the costs of
salvage, towing and storage of the vessel. ]
(d) A statement indicating:
(A) That if the vessel is seized, the vessel and personal property left inside the  vessel
may be destroyed or sold and the owner  may be liable for the costs of salvage, towing,
storage and disposal of the vessel and personal property left inside the vessel;
(B) The amount of the costs that have accrued as of the date the notice is sent; and
(C) An estimate of the final costs.
[(e) A statement indicating that if the vessel is seized the vessel may be destroyed or sold if the
costs of salvage, towing, storage and disposal are not paid. ]
[(f)] (e)  A statement indicating the owner  may request a hearing before the [ enforcement] au-
thorized agency seizes the vessel, and the time and manner in which a request may be made.
(f) A statement that the vessel will be  seized unless the problems identified in the notice
are remedied and the vessel is moved to a place where it can be  lawfully kept within the
specified time frame. The vessel and the personal property left inside  may be immediately
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 3
reclaimed by establishing to the agency’s satisfaction proof of ownership or right  to pos-
session and payment of the costs that have accrued.
(g) A statement that the owner may be cited for abandoning a  vessel or possession of a
derelict vessel under ORS 830.944.
[(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, if  an enforcement agency pro-
poses to seize a vessel by reason  of being an abandoned vessel the notice required by this section must
indicate that: ]
[(a) The vessel will be seized unless the owner moves the vessel to a place where the  vessel can
be lawfully kept within the time specified in the notice; and ]
[(b) The owner may be cited for failure to remove  an abandoned vessel if the owner fails to move
the vessel to a place where the vessel can be lawfully kept within the time specified in the notice. ]
[(4) In addition to the  requirements of subsection (2) of this section, if an enforcement agency pro-
poses to seize a vessel by reason of being a derelict vessel the notice  required by this section must in-
dicate:]
[(a) The reason or  reasons that the enforcement agency believes that the vessel is a derelict
vessel; ]
[(b) That the vessel will be seized unless  either the problems identified in the notice are remedied
within the time specified in the notice; and ]
[(c) That the owner  may be cited for possession of a derelict vessel if the owner fails to remedy the
problems identified in the notice within the time specified in the notice. ]
[(5)] (3) An owner of a vessel may request  a hearing before an [ enforcement] authorized agency
seizes a vessel  under ORS 830.908 to 830.948 by submitting a request for a hearing  within the time
frame specified by the authorized agency, which must be at least  [to the enforcement agency not
more than ] 10 business days  after the notice required by this section is given. The request must in-
dicate [ if the owner contends that the vessel is not abandoned or  derelict, or indicate such other ] spe-
cific grounds on which seizure of the vessel is challenged.
SECTION 5.  ORS 830.923 is amended to read:
830.923. An authorized agency may immediately remove and dispose of marine  debris
without notice.  [ (1) Nothing in ORS 830.908 to 830.948  affects the ability of an enforcement agency
to immediately seize without notice a vessel that presents a hazard to navigation or  an imminent threat
to public health or safety. ]
[(2) If an enforcement agency seizes without notice a vessel that  presents a hazard to navigation
or an imminent threat to  public health or safety, and the enforcement agency wishes to dispose of the
vessel under ORS 830.908 to  830.948, the enforcement agency shall provide notice as described in ORS
830.931.]
SECTION 6.  ORS 830.933 is amended to read:
830.933. (1) At any time before the date specified  in the notice given pursuant to [ ORS 830.931
(2)] ORS 830.918 , any owner may reclaim the  vessel  or personal property left inside the vessel
by:
(a) Paying all costs incurred by the [ enforcement] authorized agency in  salvaging, towing and
storing the vessel  and the personal property left inside the vessel ; and
(b) Establishing  to the satisfaction of the [ enforcement] authorized agency that the owner is able
to move the vessel to a place where the vessel can be lawfully kept.
(2) If a vessel is seized under ORS 830.908  to 830.948 [ is not reclaimed in the manner provided
by this section ], title to the vessel and all personal property found  in the vessel vests in the
[enforcement] authorized agency, and the [ enforcement] authorized  agency may sell or otherwise
dispose of the vessel and the property.
SECTION 7.  ORS 830.936 is amended to read:
830.936. (1) If an owner of  a vessel requests a [ preseizure ] hearing as provided in ORS 830.918
[(5)], the [ enforcement] authorized agency may not seize the vessel until after the hearing.
(2) If an owner of a vessel requests a hearing as provided in ORS 830.918 [ (5) or 830.931 (4)], the
[enforcement] authorized agency shall  set a time for the hearing that is no more than [ seven] 10
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 4
business days after the  [ enforcement] authorized  agency receives the request. The [ enforcement]
authorized agency shall provide notice of the hearing to the person requesting the hearing, and  to
all other persons [ described in ORS 830.918 (1) ] who were given notice under ORS 830.918 .
(3) If an owner of a vessel requests a hearing conducted under this section and fails  to appear
at the hearing, the owner is not entitled to another hearing  and the authorized agency shall seize
and dispose of the vessel and any personal property left inside as provided in ORS  830.933
[unless the owner shows good reasons to the enforcement agency for the person’s failure to appear ].
(4) An [ enforcement] authorized agency shall  conduct a single hearing under this section for all
requests for hearing that relate to the same vessel.
[(5) Hearings held under this section may be informal in nature,  but the presentation of evidence
in a hearing shall be consistent with the standards for presentation of evidence under ORS 183.450. ]
[(6)] (5)  If the notice given under ORS 830.918 indicates that the [ enforcement] authorized
agency proposes to seize a vessel by reason of being an abandoned vessel, and the  owner of a vessel
requests a [ preseizure ] hearing under ORS 830.918 [ (5)], the owner may present  a plan of action for
moving the vessel to a place where the vessel can be lawfully kept.  If the notice given under ORS
830.918 indicates that the [ enforcement] authorized agency proposes to seize a vessel  by reason of
being a derelict vessel, and  the owner of a vessel requests a [ preseizure ] hearing under ORS 830.918
[(5)], the  owner may present a plan of action for remedying the problems identified in the notice. If
the hearing officer approves the plan of action, the hearing officer by order  may establish a time for
moving the vessel, or remedying the problems, that is later than  the time specified in the notice.
If the hearing officer issues an order under this subsection, and the owner fails to move  the vessel,
or to remedy the problems, within the time allowed, the [ enforcement] authorized agency  may seize
the vessel and take such other action authorized under ORS 830.908  to 830.948 without further no-
tice to the owner or opportunity for hearing . [ except: ]
[(a) Giving post-seizure notice under ORS 830.931; and ]
[(b) If the owner requests a hearing under ORS  830.918 (5), allowing the owner to challenge the
reasonableness of salvage, towing or storage costs as provided under ORS 830.931 (5). ]
[(7) If the owner of a vessel requests a post-seizure hearing under ORS 830.931 (4)  to challenge the
reasonableness of costs  incurred by the enforcement agency in salvaging, towing or storage of the ves-
sel, costs that were incurred in compliance with laws, ordinances or rules establishing allowable  costs
for those purposes are reasonable as a matter of law. ]
[(8)] (6) If an [ enforcement] authorized agency determines after a hearing under this section that
seizure of the vessel is not warranted under the law, the [ enforcement] authorized agency shall  im-
mediately release custody of the vessel and the personal property inside  the vessel  to the owner
who requested the hearing and may not  charge the owner any costs incurred by the agency in sal-
vaging, towing or storage [ of the vessel ].
[(9)] (7) If an [ enforcement] authorized agency determines after a hearing under this section that
seizure of the vessel is warranted, the [ enforcement] authorized agency shall  seize [ the vessel if the
vessel has not already been seized ] and  dispose of the vessel  and any personal property left inside
as provided in ORS 830.933.
[(10)] (8)  An  [ enforcement] authorized  agency shall mail a written statement of the
[enforcement] authorized agency’s determination to all owners who requested  a hearing conducted
under this section.
[(11)] (9)  The hearing officer at a hearing  under this section may be an officer, official or em-
ployee of the  [ enforcement] authorized agency but may not have participated in any determination
or investigation related to seizure of the vessel that is the subject of the hearing.
[(12)] (10)  If the [ enforcement] authorized agency conducting a hearing under this section is a
state agency, the determination of the [ enforcement] authorized agency is an order  other than a
contested case and is subject to review under ORS 183.484.  If the [ enforcement] authorized agency
conducting a hearing under this section is not a state agency, judicial review of the order  is as
provided in ORS 34.010 to 34.100.
SECTION 8.  ORS 830.938 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 5
830.938. (1) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 830.908 to 830.948[ ,]:
(a) The owner of  an abandoned vessel or a derelict vessel is liable to an [ enforcement] author-
ized agency for all costs arising out of  salvage, towing, storage and disposal of a vessel seized under
ORS 830.908 to 830.948 ; and
(b) If an authorized agency has probable cause to believe that a person other  than the
owner causes  a vessel to be abandoned or derelict knowingly, intentionally, recklessly or with
criminal negligence, as  those terms are defined in ORS 161.085, that person may be held lia-
ble for all costs arising out of salvage, towing, storage and disposal of the vessel .
(2) Any order imposing liability for those costs is subject  to judicial review as provided in ORS
830.936 [(12)] (10).
[(2)] (3) If an [ enforcement] authorized  agency sells a vessel seized under ORS 830.908 to
830.948, the liability imposed under this section shall be reduced by the net proceeds of the sale.
[(3)] (4) Except for  costs of reclaiming a vessel under ORS 830.933 (1), an owner of a vessel
whose only interest in the vessel is a security interest is not liable for costs  arising out of salvage,
towing, storage and disposal of a vessel under ORS 830.908 to 830.948.
SECTION 9.  ORS 830.940 is amended to read:
830.940. An [ enforcement] authorized agency may enter  into a contract with any person to carry
out the provisions of ORS 830.908 to 830.948 on behalf of the [ enforcement] authorized agency.
SECTION 10.  ORS 830.944 is amended to read:
830.944. (1) A person commits the offense of abandoning a vessel if the person  leaves a
vessel without authorization on public or private land, the waters  of this state, or any other
water.
[(1)] (2) A person commits the offense of failure to remove an abandoned vessel if the  person is
the owner of an abandoned vessel and, after notice is  given under ORS 830.918, the person fails to
move the vessel to a place where  the vessel can be lawfully kept within the time specified in the
notice, or within the time allowed under an order issued under ORS 830.936 [ (6)] (5).
[(2)] (3) A person commits the offense of possession of a derelict vessel if :
(a) The person is the owner of a derelict  vessel and, after notice is given under ORS 830.918,
the person fails to remedy the problems identified in the notice within the time specified in  the no-
tice, or within the time allowed under an order issued under ORS 830.936 [ (6)] (5); or
(b) The person  in possession or control of a vessel knowingly, intentionally, recklessly
or with criminal negligence, as those terms are  defined in ORS 161.085, causes a vessel to
become a derelict vessel .
[(3) An owner of a vessel does not violate this section if the owner’s only  interest in the vessel is
a security interest. ]
SECTION 11.  ORS 830.948 is amended to read:
830.948. (1) The Salvaged Vessel Subaccount is established within the Boating  Safety, Law
Enforcement and Facility Account created under ORS 830.140. The subaccount shall consist of
moneys deposited into the subaccount by the State Marine Board from  fees collected pursuant to
ORS 830.790 and 830.850. The moneys in  the subaccount are continuously appropriated to the board
for the purposes specified in this section.
(2) The board may not  deposit more than $150,000 per biennium into the Salvaged Vessel Sub-
account and may not retain more than $150,000 in the subaccount at any time. After the board has
deposited $150,000 into the subaccount under this subsection or any time there is more than $150,000
in the subaccount, any remaining moneys from fees collected pursuant to ORS 830.790 and  830.850
shall be deposited in the Boating Safety, Law Enforcement and Facility Account.
(3) The board may use the moneys in the  Salvaged Vessel Subaccount to pay the expenses of the
board in implementing ORS 830.908 to 830.948 that are associated with the  salvage, towing, storage
and disposal of:
(a) Vessels other than boats that are abandoned vessels or derelict vessels; [ and]
(b) Vessels that are boats of less than 200 gross tons ; and
(c) Marine debris .
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 6
(4) The board may use the moneys in the Salvaged Vessel  Subaccount to pay an [ enforcement]
authorized agency for no more than 90 percent of the costs of salvage, towing, storage and  cleanup
of an abandoned vessel or a derelict vessel that has or had a certificate under ORS  830.770 or
830.775 and that is:
(a) A boat of less than 200 gross tons; or
(b) Any other abandoned vessel or derelict vessel that is not a boat.
(5) The board may use the moneys in the Salvaged Vessel  Subaccount to pay an [ enforcement]
authorized agency for no more than 75 percent of the costs of salvage, towing, storage and  cleanup
of an abandoned vessel or a derelict vessel that has never had a certificate under  ORS 830.770 or
830.775 and that is:
(a) A boat of less than 200 gross tons; or
(b) Any other abandoned vessel or derelict vessel that is not a boat.
(6) The board may reimburse an [ enforcement] authorized agency under subsection (4) or (5) of
this section for costs associated with an abandoned vessel or a derelict vessel only if  the [ enforce-
ment] authorized agency complied with ORS 830.908 to 830.948 in seizing the vessel.
(7) The board may use the moneys in the Salvaged Vessel Subaccount to award  grants to the
state, a city, a county,  a water improvement district, a park and recreation district or a port as
provided in ORS 830.150 for the disposal of a vessel that has or had a certificate under ORS 830.770
or 830.775 and that the owner has surrendered to an accepting public agency if:
(a) The public agency has determined  that the vessel was in danger of being an abandoned
vessel or a derelict vessel and was likely  to cause damage to the environment or become a hazard
to navigation; and
(b) The decision to accept the vessel was based solely on the public agency’s determination un-
der paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(8) The board may recover payments made  from the Salvaged Vessel Subaccount from an owner
of a vessel who is  liable for the costs of salvage, towing, storage and disposal under ORS 830.938.
The board shall deposit all funds recovered under this section  into the subaccount in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 279A.050 is amended to read:
279A.050. (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in the  Public Contracting Code, a contracting
agency shall exercise all of the contracting agency’s procurement authority in accordance with  the
provisions of the Public Contracting Code.
(b) If a contracting agency  has authority under this section to carry out functions described in
this section, or has authority to make procurements under a provision of law other than  the Public
Contracting Code, the contracting agency need not exercise the contracting agency’s authority in
accordance with the provisions of the code if, under ORS 279A.025,  the code does not apply to the
contract or contracting agency.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection and the Public Con-
tracting Code, for state agencies the Director of the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services
has all the authority available to carry out the provisions of the Public Contracting Code.
(b) Except  as otherwise provided in the Public Contracting Code, for state agencies the director
may delegate to  the State Chief Information Officer the authority to procure or supervise the pro-
curement of all goods, services and personal services related to information technology  and tele-
communications for state contracting agencies. This paragraph does  not apply to contracts under
which the contractor delivers to the state agency information technology products  or services inci-
dentally in performing a personal  services contract described in ORS chapter 279C or a construction
contract described in ORS chapter 279C.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the Public Contracting Code, the Director  of Transportation
has all the authority available to:
(a) Procure  or supervise the procurement of all services and personal services to construct, ac-
quire, plan, design, maintain and operate passenger terminal  facilities and motor vehicle parking
facilities in connection with any public transportation system in accordance with ORS 184.689 (5);
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 7
(b) Procure  or supervise the procurement of all goods, services, public improvements and per-
sonal services that relate to operating, maintaining or constructing highways, bridges and  other
transportation facilities that are subject to the authority of the Department of Transportation; and
(c) Establish standards for,  prescribe forms for and conduct the prequalification of prospective
bidders on public improvement contracts that relate to  operating, maintaining or constructing
highways, bridges and other transportation  facilities that are subject to the authority of the De-
partment of Transportation.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in the Public Contracting Code, the Secretary of State has  all
the authority to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, services and personal services  re-
lated to programs under the authority of the Secretary of State.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in the  Public Contracting Code, the State Treasurer has all the
authority to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, services and  personal services related
to programs under the authority of the State Treasurer.
(6) The state agencies listed in this subsection have all the authority to do the following  in ac-
cordance with the Public Contracting Code:
(a) The Department of  Human Services to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, ser-
vices  and personal services under ORS 179.040 for the department’s institutions and the procurement
of goods, services and personal services for  constructing, demolishing, exchanging, maintaining, op-
erating and equipping housing for the purpose of  providing care to individuals with intellectual
disabilities or other developmental disabilities, subject to applicable provisions of ORS 427.335;
(b) The Oregon Health Authority  to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, services and
personal services under ORS 179.040 and construction materials, equipment and  supplies for the
authority’s institutions and the procurement of goods, services, personal services, construction ma-
terials, equipment and  supplies for constructing, demolishing, exchanging, maintaining, operating
and equipping housing for individuals with chronic mental illness, subject to  applicable provisions
of ORS 426.504;
(c) The State Department of Fish  and Wildlife to procure or supervise the procurement of con-
struction materials, equipment, supplies, services and personal services  for public improvements,
public works or ordinary construction described in ORS 279C.320  that is subject to the authority
of the State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(d) The State Parks and Recreation  Department to procure or supervise the procurement of all
goods, services, public improvements and personal services related to state parks;
(e) The Oregon Department of Aviation to procure or supervise the  procurement of construction
materials, equipment,  supplies, services and personal services for public improvements, public works
or ordinary construction described in ORS 279C.320 that is subject to the authority of  the Oregon
Department of Aviation;
(f) The Oregon Business Development Department to procure or supervise the procurement  of
all goods, services, personal services and public improvements related to its foreign trade offices
operating outside the state;
(g) The Housing and Community Services Department to  procure or supervise the procurement
of goods, services and personal services that are unrelated to the department’s duties prescribed in
ORS chapters 456 and 458, and not otherwise provided for by ORS 456.625 (19);
(h) The Department of Corrections  to procure or supervise the procurement of construction
materials, equipment,  supplies, services and personal services for public improvements, public works
or ordinary construction described in ORS 279C.320 that is subject to the authority of the Depart-
ment of Corrections;
(i) The Department of Corrections, subject to any applicable provisions of ORS 279A.120,
279A.125, 279A.145 and  283.110 to 283.395, to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, ser-
vices and personal services under ORS 179.040 for its institutions;
(j) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs to  procure or supervise the procurement of real estate
broker and principal real estate broker services related to programs under the department’s au-
thority;
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 8
(k) The Oregon Military Department to procure or supervise the  procurement of construction
materials, equipment,  supplies, services and personal services for public improvements, public works
or ordinary construction  described in ORS 279C.320 that is subject to the authority of the Oregon
Military  Department;
(L) The Department  of Education, subject to any applicable provisions of ORS 329.075, 329.085
and 329.485 and the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95, 129  Stat. 1802), to procure or
supervise the procurement of goods, services, personal services and information  technology related
to student assessment;
(m) The Department of Early Learning and Care to procure or supervise the procurement  of
goods, services, personal services and information technology related to the authority of the  de-
partment or the Early Learning Council; and
(n) Any state agency to conduct a procurement when the agency is specifically authorized by
any provision of law other than the Public Contracting Code to enter into a contract.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding this section and ORS 279A.140 (1), the Director  of the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services has exclusive authority, unless the director delegates  the authority,
to procure or supervise the procurement of  all price agreements on behalf of the state agencies
identified in subsection (6) of this section under which more than one  state agency may order goods,
services or personal services.
(b) The director may delegate to the State Chief Information  Officer the exclusive authority to
procure or supervise the procurement  of all price agreements related to information technology and
telecommunications on behalf of  the state agencies identified in subsection (6) of this section.
Notwithstanding any authority  that a state agency may have under subsection (3) or (6) of this
section, the state agency may not establish a price agreement or enter into a contract for  goods,
services or personal services without the approval of the director or the  State Chief Information
Officer if the director  or the State Chief Information Officer has established a price agreement for
the goods, services or personal services.
(c) The State Chief Information Officer may review any solicitation document  for procuring in-
formation technology or telecommunications that a state  agency intends to issue before the state
agency issues the solicitation document and may require the state agency to name the  State Chief
Information Officer as a third-party beneficiary with full authority to enforce the terms and condi-
tions of any public contract for information technology or telecommunications. The State Chief In-
formation Officer  must approve a state agency’s procurement for information technology or
telecommunications if the procurement has an anticipated contract price of  $1 million or more. The
State Chief Information Officer may require the state agency  to name the State Chief Information
Officer as the contracting party on behalf of  the State of Oregon in a procurement for information
technology or telecommunications that has an anticipated contract price of $1 million or more.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in the Public Contracting Code, the Director of the De-
partment of State Lands has  all the authority to procure or supervise the procurement of
goods, services and personal services related  to the removal of abandoned vessels and dere-
lict vessels, as defined in ORS 830.908, and derelict structures as defined in ORS 274.376.
SECTION 13.
ORS 830.928 and 830.931 are repealed.
SECTION 14. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 9
Passed by Senate March 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 795 (SB 795-A) Page 10